District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-501

“Limited partnership” defined.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 655, Pub. L. 87-716, § 1
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-201.
1973 Ed., § 41-401.